Utah statutes.
61-2a-12.   Moneys accumulated -- Excess set aside -- Purpose.
(1)  Money accumulated in the fund in excess of $100,000 shall be set aside
and segregated to be used by the division to:
(a)  investigate violations of this chapter or Chapter 2, Division of Real
Estate, related to fraud; and
(b)  advance education and research in the field of real estate.
(2)  The division may only use the excess monies described in Subsection (1)
only in a manner consistent with Subsection (1), including for courses:
(a)  sponsored by the division;
(b)  offered by the division in conjunction with any university or college in
the state; or
(c)  provided for by contracting for a particular research project in the
field of real estate for the state.
